Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Coal Road System

177.976.
Coal transporter — Use of roads to limit of vehicle registration license — Restrictions to promote public safety and convenience — Regulations. [Repealed.]

177.977.
Directory of coal road system.

The Transportation Cabinet shall publish a directory, including supporting maps and other documents, designating the official coal road system in coal impact and coal producing counties which shall include all public highways, roads, bridges, and streets over which quantities of coal sufficient to significantly affect the condition and state of repair of such highways, roads, bridges, and streets have been transported in the immediately preceding year. The cabinet shall further publish the total county mileage of the official coal road system and the total ton-miles within each coal impact and coal producing county for said preceding year.

Every person, producer or processor shipping or transporting coal over the public highways, roads, bridges, and streets, shall file with the Transportation Cabinet information at intervals as the cabinet shall designate by administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, for the purpose of identifying those highways, roads, and streets comprising the coal road system and the quantities of coal transported thereon, in order that the cabinet can accurately calculate total ton-miles within each coal impact and coal producing county. A copy of the information furnished to the Energy and Environment Cabinet pursuant to the provisions of KRS

350.0285

and a copy of the information furnished to the Department for Natural Resources pursuant to the provisions of KRS

351.070

and

352.420

shall be submitted to the Transportation Cabinet to satisfy the reporting requirements of this subsection and the transportation plan shall be annually updated to reflect in route changes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 203, § 11, effective July 15, 1982; repealed, reenact, and amend, Acts 1984, ch. 373, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 488, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 123, § 20, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 231, effective July 15, 2010.

177.9771.
Extended weight coal or coal by-products haul road system.

The “extended weight coal or coal by-products haul road system” shall consist of all state-maintained toll roads or state-maintained roads which were previously toll roads and the public highways over which quantities of coal or coal by-products in excess of fifty thousand (50,000) tons were transported by motor vehicles during the period from January 1, 1985, through December 31, 1985, and shall be updated annually thereafter.

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall by official order on or before November 1, of each year, certify such public highways or portions thereof, as fulfill the criteria in subsection (1) of this section, as the extended weight coal or coal by-products haul road system.

The total tons of coal or coal by-products transported by motor vehicles over any public highway shall be determined from the official coal or coal by-products road system transportation report required pursuant to KRS

177.977

.

Any vehicle, when registered with a declared gross weight of eighty thousand (80,000) pounds and when transporting coal or coal by-products over public highways which are part of the extended weight coal or coal by-products haul road system or portions thereof, may be operated at the weights as set forth below in excess of the maximum gross weight prescribed in KRS

189.221

and

189.222

and any other maximum weight limitations on state or county maintained systems by paying the corresponding decal fee as set forth below:

A single unit truck having one (1) steering axle and two (2) axles in tandem shall be limited to a maximum gross weight of ninety thousand (90,000) pounds with a tolerance of five percent (5%), and pay a decal fee of one hundred sixty dollars ($160) annually;

A single unit truck having one (1) steering axle and three (3) axles in tridem arrangement shall be limited to a maximum gross weight of one hundred thousand (100,000) pounds with a tolerance of five percent (5%), and pay a decal fee of two hundred sixty dollars ($260) annually;

Tractor-semitrailer combinations with five (5) or more axles shall be limited to a maximum gross weight of one hundred twenty thousand (120,000) pounds with a tolerance of five percent (5%), and pay a decal fee of three hundred sixty dollars ($360) annually;

Any motor carrier involved in the transportation of coal or coal by-products which meets gross axle weights of twenty thousand (20,000) pounds per axle and twelve thousand (12,000) pounds for the steering axle may register in excess of eighty thousand (80,000) pounds by payment of eight hundred forty dollars ($840) plus an additional decal fee of ten dollars ($10) per one thousand (1,000) pounds of registered weight above eighty thousand (80,000) pounds;

For purposes of this section, KRS

177.979

, and

189.230

, and for purposes of the extended weight coal or coal by-products haul system, the dimensional requirements of motor vehicles shall conform to all appropriate federal laws and regulations;

The payment of the decal fee shall be in addition to any state registration fee, user fee, or other decal fee, including the registration fee as specified in KRS 186.050(3);

Motor vehicles used in the transportation of coal or coal by-products under cooperative agreements pursuant to KRS

177.979

shall be exempt from the payment of the decal fee as set forth in this section and the registration fee as set forth in KRS 186.050(3) as long as the truck is driven over cooperative roads only while full. The Transportation Cabinet shall issue identifying license plates for those motor vehicles under cooperative agreements;

All fees under this section shall be scheduled for payment and prorated pursuant to the provisions of KRS

186.051

; and

All revenues generated pursuant to this section shall be credited to a special account within the road fund called the “energy recovery road fund.”

Sixty percent (60%) of all energy recovery road funds shall be used by the Department of Highways for construction, maintenance, and repair of the state-maintained portion of the extended weight coal or coal by-products haul road system.

Forty percent (40%) of all energy recovery road funds shall be distributed to the fiscal court of those counties in which coal or coal by-products are transported for the sole purpose of construction, maintenance, and repair of the county-maintained portion of the extended weight coal or coal by-products haul system. The distribution of funds to the counties shall be proportioned based on the miles of county roads on the extended weight coal or coal by-products haul system in each county compared to the total mileage of county roads in the total extended weight coal or coal by-products haul road system and the tons of coal or coal by-products transported over county roads on the extended weight coal or coal by-products haul system in each county compared to the total tons of coal or coal by-products transported over county roads in the total extended weight coal or coal by-products haul road system.

Nothing in this section shall be construed or administered to jeopardize the receipt of federal funds for highway purposes and the secretary of transportation shall not act in any manner which shall jeopardize federal highway funds or funds to be received by the Commonwealth. This section shall not be construed to authorize any vehicle to operate on a federal interstate highway in excess of those limits prescribed in KRS

189.222

. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the Department of Highways from providing for the public safety and convenience of the traveling public on the highway.

As soon as practical after the report is prepared and published pursuant to KRS

177.977

for any calendar year after 1985, the secretary shall add to or delete from the extended weight coal or coal by-products haul road system public highways or portions thereof based upon the criteria set out in this section. Deletion of a public road or portion of it from the extended weight coal or coal by-products haul road system shall not affect the eligibility of the roads for highway funds or programs applicable to the extended weight coal or coal by-products haul road system.

A fiscal court, a governing body of a city, consolidated local government, or urban-county government may by resolution, make recommendation to the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet that certain roads or road segments in the county or corporate city limits pose inherent and definite hazards, special conditions, or greatly impact the economy of the county or city and that the secretary shall meet with said fiscal court or local governing body and take into consideration their concerns before adding to or deleting from the extended weight coal or coal by-products haul system.

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A necessary to administer the provisions of this section, KRS

177.9772

,

177.979

, and

189.230

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 498, § 1, effective April 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 415, § 5, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 236, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 324, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 346, § 182, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 92, § 250, effective January 1, 2015.

177.9772.
Impoundment of vehicle for violation.

Any motor vehicle transporting coal in violation of the weight limits provided for by KRS

189.221

and

189.222

for which the extended weight users’ tax has not been paid as evidenced by an affixed extended weight users’ decal or which is not being operated in accordance with the provisions of a cooperative agreement shall be deemed in violation of KRS

177.9771

. The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet may impound said vehicle until such time as the extended weight users’ tax and all costs incurred in the impoundment and storage of the vehicle have been paid.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 498, § 7, effective April 1, 1987.

177.978.
Energy recovery road fund — Uses — Transfer of funds from coal recovery road fund.

All revenues generated from the purchase of decals pursuant to KRS 177.990(5) and KRS 177.9771(4) and no other taxes or fees normally assessed on motor carriers shall be credited to a special account within the road fund called the “energy recovery road fund” and any additional funds obtained through state appropriation, gifts, grants and federal funds may be credited to the special account, and shall be used, in addition to those road funds normally used for said highways, exclusively by the Transportation Cabinet for those costs attendant to highway purposes for roads designated as part of the extended weight coal haul road system. All funds in the account shall be carried forward at the end of each year.

All funds credited to the “coal recovery road fund” shall be transferred to the “energy recovery road fund.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 373, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 331, § 31, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 498, § 2, effective April 1, 1987; 2002, ch. 183, § 14, effective August 1, 2002.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by 1986 Acts, ch. 331, sec. 31, effective July 15, 1986, and ch. 498, sec. 2, effective April 1, 1987, part of which are in conflict and cannot be codified together. Pursuant to KRS 7.136(3), ch. 498, sec. 2, prevails.

177.979.
Cooperative agreements between Department of Highways and transporters of coal in vehicles exceeding maximum weight limits on state-maintained system.

Any person engaged in the mining, processing, transporting or sale of coal that provides for the transportation of coal in vehicles exceeding the maximum weight limits on the state-maintained system shall enter into a cooperative agreement with the Department of Highways, or give bond for damages as provided by KRS

189.271

, if a road to be used is not part of the extended weight coal or coal by-products haul road system. However, if a resolution issued pursuant to KRS 177.9771(9) on a road with a maximum allowable gross weight of eighty thousand (80,000) pounds is approved by the Transportation Cabinet, a cooperative agreement shall not be required. Such cooperative agreements shall provide for an equitable apportionment of the incremental costs for design, maintenance, construction, or reconstruction of those roads and bridges, except those roads and bridges which are part of the federal interstate highway system, resulting from the transportation of coal by trucks transporting coal in excess of the maximum weight limits on the state-maintained system and covered by the cooperative agreement. Nothing contained herein shall effect the continuing validity of any existing agreement.

Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 143 the total tax contributions from any person entering into a cooperative agreement, as specified in this section, shall not exceed, in the aggregate, the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per mile per year on those roads covered by the cooperative agreement, but shall equal a minimum of one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) per motor vehicle hauling coal over those cooperative road segments over three (3) miles in length, but such contribution shall not exceed ten cents ($0.10) per ton of coal hauled on cooperative roads per year from an individual coal operator unless otherwise agreed to by the operator. The Transportation Cabinet may allow any person, under the cooperative agreement, to provide for the design, approved maintenance, construction, or reconstruction provided for in subsection (1) of this section in accordance with guidelines or standards prescribed by the cabinet. In the event any person exceeds his annual total tax contribution as authorized under a cooperative agreement, such person may petition the commissioner of vehicle regulation for a carry over for future years liability. All funds collected pursuant to this section shall be expended on those roads covered by the cooperative agreement.

Notwithstanding any provision of KRS

177.976

to

177.981

, the Commonwealth shall not be relieved of expending its normal routine maintenance on all roads covered by the cooperative agreements.

Any person who entered into a cooperative agreement may terminate it upon submitted written notice to the Department of Highways.

If the person requesting termination of the cooperative agreement has reported to the Transportation Cabinet that fifty thousand (50,000) or more tons of coal have been transported over the road covered by the cooperative agreement, the Transportation Cabinet shall immediately, by official order or emergency administrative regulation, add the road segment to the list of roads currently comprising the extended weight coal or coal by-products haul road system.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 373, § 8, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 498, § 3, effective April 1, 1987; 1994, ch. 236, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 324, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

177.980.
Coal recovery road fund — Assessments. [Repealed.]

177.981.
Fiscal court may make cooperative agreement.

Nothing in KRS

177.9771

to

177.981

shall be construed as prohibiting a county fiscal court from entering into a cooperative agreement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 373, § 10, effective July 13, 1984.

177.985.
Extended weight unrefined petroleum products haul road system. [Effective until June 30, 2028]

The provisions of this section shall be in effect until June 30, 2028.

As used in this section and KRS

177.986

, “extended weight unrefined petroleum products haul road system” consists of all state-maintained highways over which quantities of unrefined petroleum products in excess of fifty thousand (50,000) tons were transported by motor vehicles during the period from January 1, 2022, through December 31, 2022, and annually thereafter.

Except as provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection, on or before November 1, 2022, and annually thereafter on November 1 of each year, the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall, by official order, certify the highways or portions thereof, which meet the criteria in subsection (2) of this section, as the extended weight unrefined petroleum products haul road system.

If, during the year 2022, a quantity of unrefined petroleum products that meets the threshold set out in subsection (2) of this section is transported on any state-maintained highway, the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall, within thirty (30) days by official order, certify those highways or portions thereof, as part of the extended weight unrefined petroleum products haul road system.

The total tons of unrefined petroleum products transported by motor vehicles over any public highway shall be determined from the reports required by KRS

177.986

.

Any vehicle, when registered with a declared gross weight of eighty thousand (80,000) pounds and when transporting unrefined petroleum products over state-maintained highways which are part of the extended weight unrefined petroleum products haul road system, may be operated at weights in excess of the maximum gross weight prescribed in KRS

189.221

and

189.222

and any other maximum weight limitations on state- or county-maintained systems, if it complies with the requirements of this subsection.

Trucks configured using an axle system approved by the Transportation Cabinet in accordance with paragraph (c) of this subsection may operate up to a maximum gross weight of one hundred twenty thousand (120,000) pounds with a gross weight tolerance of five percent (5%).

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to specify approved axle configurations that may be used when operating under this section.

For purposes of this section and KRS

189.230

, the dimensional requirements of motor vehicles shall conform to all appropriate federal laws and regulations.

The permit fee for each truck operated under this section shall be two thousand dollars ($2,000) annually. Upon renewal of an annual permit issued under this section, the permit holder shall report to the cabinet the number of trips made and the total miles driven under the permit during the previous year.

The payment of the permit fee shall be in addition to any state registration fee, user fee, or other permit fee, including the registration fee as specified in KRS 186.050(3).

Each truck operating under a permit pursuant to this section shall be equipped with global positioning system technology that keeps a record of locations traveled. The travel records of trucks operating under a permit shall be open to inspection by the Transportation Cabinet.

Any driver of a vehicle identified in this section operating under a permit shall, in addition to possessing a valid Class A commercial driver’s license, be approved by the Kentucky State Police to operate a vehicle under this section.

All revenues generated pursuant to this section shall be credited to the road fund and shall be appropriated for the uses of that fund.

Nothing in this section shall be construed or administered to jeopardize the receipt of federal funds for highway purposes, and the secretary of transportation shall not act in any manner which jeopardizes federal highway funds or funds to be received by the Commonwealth.

This section shall not be construed to:

Authorize any vehicle to operate on a federal interstate highway in excess of those limits prescribed in KRS

189.222

; or

Prohibit the Department of Highways from providing for the public safety and convenience of the traveling public on the highway, including by limiting travel on roads with bridges having weight restrictions.

As soon as practical after the report is prepared and published pursuant to KRS

177.986

for any calendar year after 2022, the secretary shall add to or delete from the extended weight unrefined petroleum products haul road system any sections of state-maintained highways based upon the criteria set out in this section. Deletion of a public road or portion of it from the extended weight unrefined petroleum products haul road system shall not affect the eligibility of the roads for highway funds or programs applicable to the extended weight unrefined petroleum products haul road system.

A representative of the Transportation Cabinet shall transmit a report of roads to be included in the extended weight unrefined petroleum products haul road system to the fiscal court of each county in which a road or road segment is eligible for inclusion in the system. The secretary shall take into consideration any concerns expressed by a fiscal court before adding a road to the extended weight unrefined petroleum products haul road system.

The Transportation Cabinet shall inspect all of the routes in the extended weight unrefined petroleum products haul road system annually to determine the extent of degradation of any segments of road or bridges.

The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A necessary to administer this section.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 126, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

177.986.
Directory of extended weight unrefined petroleum products haul road system — Publication — Reporting system. [Effective until June 30, 2028]

The provisions of this section shall be in effect until June 30, 2028.

The Transportation Cabinet shall publish a directory, including supporting maps and other documents, designating the extended weight unrefined petroleum products haul road system, which shall include all state-maintained highways and bridges over which quantities of unrefined petroleum products in excess of the amount identified in KRS 177.985(2) have been transported in the immediately preceding year. The cabinet shall further publish the total county mileage of the extended weight unrefined petroleum products haul road system for that preceding year. Publication of the information in this subsection may be by electronic means.

Beginning January 1, 2022, every person, producer, or processor shipping or transporting unrefined petroleum products over any state-maintained highway or bridge shall file with the Transportation Cabinet information for the purpose of identifying those state-maintained highways comprising the extended weight unrefined petroleum products haul road system and the quantities of unrefined petroleum products transported thereon, in order that the cabinet can accurately calculate total ton-miles within each county.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to carry out the requirements of this section, including publication of the information outlined in subsection (2) of this section and establishment of a reporting system for transporters of unrefined petroleum products.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 126, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.